src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NounRoot
etterspørsel+N:etterspørs F1esM1e ; ! LEMMA_ID=19184
førstedagsstempel+N:førstedagsstemp M1N1sN1t ; ! LEMMA_ID=27802
galder+N:gald M1eN1eN1es ; ! LEMMA_ID=28793
gimmer+N:gim F4ds ; ! LEMMA_ID=30178
gudlegdom+N:gudlegdom M1eM1me ; ! LEMMA_ID=33388
handskam+N:handskam F1em ; ! LEMMA_ID=34955
hovold+N:hovold F1F0 ; ! LEMMA_ID=126242
hugnad+N:hugnad M3e ; ! LEMMA_ID=38423
kaliber+N:kaliber M1tN1 ; ! LEMMA_ID=44268
kjøttstempel+N:kjøttstemp M1tN1sN1t ; ! LEMMA_ID=46783
kongressmedlem+N:kongressmedlem M4M4m ; ! LEMMA_ID=49429
krepseklo+N:krepsekl F0o ; ! LEMMA_ID=50808
kuvom+N:kuvom F1mF1mo ; ! LEMMA_ID=52328
kvissel+N:kvis F1ds ; ! LEMMA_ID=53082
kvitauga+N:kvitaug N0 ; ! LEMMA_ID=53112
landsfader+N:landsf M1to ; ! LEMMA_ID=53970
ljodkjelde+N:ljodkjeld F2 ; ! LEMMA_ID=56155
lågspentmaster+N:lågspentmaster F1s ;
madam+N:madam F1m ; ! LEMMA_ID=58585
maternitet+N:maternitet M1 ; ! LEMMA_ID=59660
mellomfot+N:mellomf M3o ; ! LEMMA_ID=60172
merskum+N:merskum M1emN1em ; ! LEMMA_ID=60451
mette+N:mett F2M2 ; ! LEMMA_ID=60585
moder+N:m F1to ; ! LEMMA_ID=61549
muselmann+N:muselm MANN ; ! LEMMA_ID=62561
møkagreip+N:møkagreip F1M1N1 ; ! LEMMA_ID=62934
navlestreng+N:navlestreng M4 ; ! LEMMA_ID=64063
nikkel+N:nikkel M1eN1e ; ! LEMMA_ID=64619
normannar+N:normannar M0M1 ; ! LEMMA_ID=64970
oldemor+N:oldem F0 ; ! LEMMA_ID=66315
opium+N:opium M1N1 ; ! LEMMA_ID=66911
opprykk+N:opprykk M4N1 ; ! LEMMA_ID=67278
oppvarming+N:oppvarming F4 ; ! LEMMA_ID=67474
otium+N:otium N0eN1e ; ! LEMMA_ID=67964
overkøyrsel+N:overkøyrs F1sM1t ; ! LEMMA_ID=68182
parameter+N:paramet M1M1t ; ! LEMMA_ID=68979
petimeter+N:petimet M1M1tN1N1s ; ! LEMMA_ID=69796
produktivkrefter+N:produktivkrefte F0f ; ! LEMMA_ID=71733
proklama+N:proklama N0N1 ; ! LEMMA_ID=71840
prokura+N:prokura M3N1 ; ! LEMMA_ID=71848
promemoria+N:promemoria M3N0N1 ; ! LEMMA_ID=71864
rammel+N:ram M1eN1dseN1e ; ! LEMMA_ID=73204
raster+N:raster M1N1N1s ; ! LEMMA_ID=73503
ravasje+N:ravasj M2e ; ! LEMMA_ID=73661
real+N:real M0 ; ! LEMMA_ID=73701
reddhug+N:reddhug M1e ; ! LEMMA_ID=73778
rim+N:rim F4m ; ! LEMMA_ID=75135
rom+N:rom M1em ; ! LEMMA_ID=75479
saga+N:saga F0F1M3 ; ! LEMMA_ID=76889
sagatått+N:sagat M1M3o ; ! LEMMA_ID=76901
saltbrenning+N:saltbrenning F1e ; ! LEMMA_ID=77144
sanskrit+N:sanskrit M1N0 ; ! LEMMA_ID=77914
savenever+N:savenev F4s ; ! LEMMA_ID=78103
sirkelradius+N:sirkelradi M0-us ;
sjukesyster+N:sjukesyst F1t ; ! LEMMA_ID=80602
sjølvpisking+N:sjølvpisking F3 ; ! LEMMA_ID=135692
skarvedom+N:skarvedom M1eM1em ; ! LEMMA_ID=81499
skattepengar+N:skattepenga M1f ; ! LEMMA_ID=81555
skjoldlus+N:skjoldl F0F1o ; ! LEMMA_ID=82548
skoliose+N:skolios M2 ; ! LEMMA_ID=83213
skrivegreier+N:skrivegreier F2f ;
skruvmor+N:skruvmor F0F1 ;
skruvmutter+N:skruvmutter M1M1dt ;
skånsel+N:skåns F1seM1e ; ! LEMMA_ID=85108
sluttsetel+N:sluttset M1t ; ! LEMMA_ID=85935
solfjerre+N:solfjerr M2N2 ; ! LEMMA_ID=87432
stabelhengsel+N:stabelhengs F1sN1sN1t ; ! LEMMA_ID=89075
stakkarsting+N:stakkarsting TING ; ! LEMMA_ID=89143
stand+N:stand M3oN1 ; ! LEMMA_ID=89212
sylvskei+N:sylvskei F1 ; ! LEMMA_ID=93160
søppel+N:søp F1dseN1dseN1e ; ! LEMMA_ID=93870
søtsaker+N:søtsaker F1f ;
takkam+N:takkam M1m ; ! LEMMA_ID=94268
tenkefridom+N:tenkefridom M1M1m ; ! LEMMA_ID=95566
toneart+N:toneart F1M1 ; ! LEMMA_ID=97544
trim+N:trim M1me ; ! LEMMA_ID=99166
tsarina+N:tsarina DONNA ; ! LEMMA_ID=100258
turistferdsel+N:turistferds F1es ; ! LEMMA_ID=100672
tverrstong+N:tverrst F1o ; ! LEMMA_ID=101174
tyngdekraft+N:tyngdekr F1F1o ; ! LEMMA_ID=101498
tøystrimmel+N:tøystrim M1dt ; ! LEMMA_ID=101771
udott+N:udott F1N1 ; ! LEMMA_ID=102662
ulvelune+N:ulvelun F2N2 ; ! LEMMA_ID=103615
vakuumpakning+N:vakuumpakning F3M1 ; ! LEMMA_ID=107170
valutaomsetnad+N:valutaomsetnad M3 ; ! LEMMA_ID=107375
vierkjerr+N:vierkjerr N1 ; ! LEMMA_ID=110834
vinster+N:vinst F3s ; ! LEMMA_ID=111467
årette+N:årett F2M2N2 ; ! LEMMA_ID=114664
årspengar+N:årspenga M0f ; ! LEMMA_ID=114753
øre+N:ør M0N0 ; ! LEMMA_ID=113883
øreklips+N:øreklips M0N1 ;
ørn+N:ørn F4M1 ; ! LEMMA_ID=113971
